Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.320

Warrants—Interest rate—Payment.

All city and town warrants shall draw interest from and after their presentation to the treasurer, but no compound interest shall be paid on any warrant directly or indirectly. The city or town treasurer shall pay all warrants in the order of their number and date of issue whenever there are sufficient funds in the treasury applicable to the payment. If five hundred dollars (or any sum less than five hundred dollars as may be prescribed by ordinance) is accumulated in any fund having warrants outstanding against it, the city or town treasurer shall publish a call for warrants to that amount in the next issue of the official newspaper of the city or town. The notice shall describe the warrants so called by number and specifying the fund upon which they were drawn: PROVIDED, That no call need be made until the amount accumulated is equal to the amount due on the warrant longest outstanding: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no more than two calls shall be made in any one month.

Any city or town treasurer who knowingly fails to call for or pay any warrant in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than five hundred dollars and conviction thereof shall be sufficient cause for removal from office.

[ 1985 c 469 s 20; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.320. Prior: (i) 1893 c 48 s 1, part; RRS s 4116, part. (ii) 1895 c 152 s 2, part; RRS s 4119, part. (iii) 1895 c 152 s 1, part; RRS s 4118, part.]